Ohio, session 136, HB129.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 319.301, 323.32, 5705.01, 5705.03, 5705.194, and 5709.92 be amended and sections 5705.195, 5705.196, and 5705.197 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 319.301. (A) The reductions required by division (D) of this section do not apply to any of the following: (1) Taxes levied at whatever rate is required to produce a specified amount of tax money, including a tax levied under section 5705.199 or 5748.09 of the Revised Code, or an amount to pay debt charges; (2) Taxes levied within the one per cent limitation imposed by Section 2 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution; (3) Taxes provided for by the charter of a municipal corporation. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Real property" includes real property owned by a railroad. (2) "Carryover property" means all real property on the current year's tax list except: (a) Land and improvements that were not taxed by the district in both the preceding year and the current year; (b) Land and improvements that were not in the same class in both the preceding year and the current year. (3) "Effective tax rate" means with respect to each class of property: (a) The sum of the total taxes that would have been charged and payable for current expenses against real property in that class if each of the district's taxes were reduced for the current year under division (D)(1) of this section without regard to the application of division (E)(3) of this section divided by (b) The taxable value of all real property in that class. (4) "Taxes charged and payable" means the taxes charged and payable prior to any reduction required by section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (C) The tax commissioner shall make the determinations required by this section each year, without regard to whether a taxing district has territory in a county to which section 5715.24 of the Revised Code applies for that year. Separate determinations shall be made for each of the two classes established pursuant to section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (D) With respect to each tax authorized to be levied by each taxing district, the tax commissioner, annually, shall do both of the following: (1) Determine by what percentage, if any, the sums levied by such tax against the carryover property in each class would have to be reduced for the tax to levy the same number of dollars against such property in that class in the current year as were charged against such property by such tax in the preceding year subsequent to the reduction made under this section but before the reduction made under section 319.302 of the Revised Code. In the case of a tax levied for the first time that is not a renewal of an existing tax, the commissioner shall determine by what percentage the sums that would otherwise be levied by such tax against carryover property in each class would have to be reduced to equal the amount that would have been levied if the full rate thereof had been imposed against the total taxable value of such property in the preceding tax year. (2) Certify each percentage determined in division (D)(1) of this section, as adjusted under division (E) of this section, and the class of property to which that percentage applies to the auditor of each county in which the district has territory. The auditor, after complying with section 319.30 of the Revised Code, shall reduce the sum to be levied by such tax against each parcel of real property in the district by the percentage so certified for its class. Certification shall be made by the first day of September except in the case of a tax levied for the first time, in which case certification shall be made within fifteen days of the date the county auditor submits the information necessary to make the required determination. (E)(1) As used in division (E)(2) of this section, "pre-1982 joint vocational taxes" means, with respect to a class of property, the difference between the following amounts: (a) The taxes charged and payable in tax year 1981 against the property in that class for the current expenses of the joint vocational school district of which the school district is a part after making all reductions under this section; (b) Two-tenths of one per cent of the taxable value of all real property in that class. If the amount in division (E)(1)(b) of this section exceeds the amount in division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the pre-1982 joint vocational taxes shall be zero. As used in divisions (E)(2) and (3) of this section, "taxes charged and payable" has the same meaning as in division (B)(4) of this section and excludes any tax charged and payable in 1985 or thereafter from a tax levied under sections 5705.194 to 5705.197 or section 5705.194 or 5705.199, 5705.213, 5705.219, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code that is approved by electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, until the first tax year, starting in tax year 2026, that section 5715.24 applies in a county that includes territory of the school district. (2) If in the case of a school district other than a joint vocational or cooperative education school district any percentage required to be used in division (D)(2) of this section for either class of property could cause the total taxes charged and payable for current expenses to be less than two per cent of the taxable value of all real property in that class that is subject to taxation by the district, the commissioner shall determine what percentages would cause the district's total taxes charged and payable for current expenses against that class, after all reductions that would otherwise be made under this section, to equal, when combined with the pre-1982 joint vocational taxes against that class, the lesser of the following: (a) The sum of the rates at which those taxes are authorized to be levied; (b) Two per cent of the taxable value of the property in that class. The auditor shall use such percentages in making the reduction required by this section for that class. (3) If in the case of a joint vocational school district any percentage required to be used in division (D)(2) of this section for either class of property could cause the total taxes charged and payable for current expenses for that class to be less than two-tenths of one per cent of the taxable value of that class, the commissioner shall determine what percentages would cause the district's total taxes charged and payable for current expenses for that class, after all reductions that would otherwise be made under this section, to equal that amount. The auditor shall use such percentages in making the reductions required by this section for that class. (4) If a school district is affected by division (E)(2) or (3) of this section for either class of property, and additional current expense taxes are levied or are included in the definition of taxes charged and payable, then, for the first tax year those taxes are levied or included, the reduction computed under division (D) of this section for that district shall be computed as though the sums of current expenses taxes levied for the district and charged against that class in the preceding tax year were equivalent to two per cent or two-tenths of one per cent, respectively, of the taxable value of all real property in that class. (F) No reduction shall be made under this section in the rate at which any tax is levied. (G) The commissioner may order a county auditor to furnish any information the commissioner needs to make the determinations required under division (D) or (E) of this section, and the auditor shall supply the information in the form and by the date specified in the order. If the auditor fails to comply with an order issued under this division, except for good cause as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner shall withhold from such county or taxing district therein fifty per cent of state revenues to local governments pursuant to section 5747.50 of the Revised Code or shall direct the department of education and workforce to withhold therefrom fifty per cent of state revenues to school districts pursuant to Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall withhold the distribution of such revenues until the county auditor has complied with this division, and the department shall withhold the distribution of such revenues until the commissioner has notified the department that the county auditor has complied with this division. (H) If the commissioner is unable to certify a tax reduction factor for either class of property in a taxing district located in more than one county by the last day of November because information required under division (G) of this section is unavailable, the commissioner may compute and certify an estimated tax reduction factor for that district for that class. The estimated factor shall be based upon an estimate of the unavailable information. Upon receipt of the actual information for a taxing district that received an estimated tax reduction factor, the commissioner shall compute the actual tax reduction factor and use that factor to compute the taxes that should have been charged and payable against each parcel of property for the year for which the estimated reduction factor was used. The amount by which the estimated factor resulted in an overpayment or underpayment in taxes on any parcel shall be added to or subtracted from the amount due on that parcel in the ensuing tax year. A percentage or a tax reduction factor determined or computed by the commissioner under this section shall be used solely for the purpose of reducing the sums to be levied by the tax to which it applies for the year for which it was determined or computed. It shall not be used in making any tax computations for any ensuing tax year. (I) In making the determinations under division (D)(1) of this section, the tax commissioner shall take account of changes in the taxable value of carryover property resulting from complaints filed under section 5715.19 of the Revised Code for determinations made for the tax year in which such changes are reported to the commissioner. Such changes shall be reported to the commissioner on the first abstract of real property filed with the commissioner under section 5715.23 of the Revised Code following the date on which the complaint is finally determined by the board of revision or by a court or other authority with jurisdiction on appeal. The tax commissioner shall account for such changes in making the determinations only for the tax year in which the change in valuation is reported. Such a valuation change shall not be used to recompute the percentages determined under division (D)(1) of this section for any prior tax year. Sec. 323.32. As used in this section, "railroad note" means a note issued pursuant to a court order in the reorganization of a railroad company under section 77 of the Bankruptcy Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, with respect to all payments received in settlement of claims arising from delinquent property tax charges and ordered to be paid by a railroad company under a plan of reorganization as ordered by a federal district court in accordance with provisions of Chapter VIII of the "Federal Bankruptcy Act," 11 U.S.C.A. 201-208, the following provisions shall apply: (A) Except as provided in division (H) of this section, all of such payments shall be made payable, and delivered, to the county in which the taxing district sharing in a claim for delinquent taxes is located. Any notes included in such payment shall be issued to such county treasurer, who shall be the custodian of all of said notes, and who shall be liable therefor upon the treasurer's bond until such time as said notes mature, are sold, or otherwise lawfully pass from the treasurer's custody. (B) Upon receipt of a payment by cash or check, the county treasurer shall immediately cause such funds to be paid into the county treasury and credited to a special fund established for this purpose, which shall be known as the "undivided bankruptcy claims fund." All of such moneys so received, including any earned interest, shall be credited to said fund. (C) When the total claim for each county has been satisfied by the receipt of cash or notes, or both, the county auditor shall remit from the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property in each county, all charges appearing thereon in the name of the railroad company for which such payment has been made, which are delinquent and unpaid from any year previous to the tax year 1977. (D) At any time that funds are present in the undivided bankruptcy claims fund, either upon initial settlement or at any later time, the county auditor shall, forthwith, distribute by auditors' warrant, such funds to the various taxing districts of the county, in which the property taxes, from which the claim in bankruptcy has derived, were originally charged. The funds so distributed shall be apportioned among the various taxing authorities within each taxing district in the same proportions as the said taxes were originally levied, taking into account the various rates of taxation levied for different purposes for each year in which such taxes were charged and remained unpaid, and any unpaid special assessments, including compound interest thereon at the rate of six per cent per annum to January 1, 1978. In making such distribution, the auditor shall, first, deduct an amount equal to one per cent of the total amount to be distributed, as fees for services of the county auditor and treasurer in making collection and distribution of the claim in bankruptcy. Such deduction shall be in lieu of all fees provided for in sections 319.54 and 321.26 of the Revised Code. The amount so deducted shall be credited to the general fund of the county. If any funds received pursuant to this section represent taxes which, if collected, would have resulted from any general or emergency levy which has since expired, such funds may be credited to the general operating fund and expended as though they are proceeds from a current levy, and if any of such funds represent taxes from any current general bond retirement levy or one which has since expired, said funds may be credited to the current bond retirement fund and used to service any current bond indebtedness, or may be credited to the general operating fund of the district, if so designated by a majority of the members of the taxing authority of the taxing district. (E) Except as provided in division (H) of this section, when, as a part of the settlement of a claim in bankruptcy of a reorganized railroad company a county receives notes on behalf of a taxing authority in partial payment of said claim, the county treasurer shall, within a reasonable length of time, notify the taxing authority of each taxing district sharing in the claim that such notes are in the treasurer's custody. Within sixty days of receipt of such notice, each taxing authority shall decide by a resolution approved by a majority of its members whether: (1) The notes shall remain in custody of the county treasurer, as issued, and allowed to mature according to the terms presented on their face with the proceeds to be distributed upon maturity pursuant to division (D) of this section; or (2) The railroad notes shall be exchanged for several new notes in denominations equal to the proportionate share, or portion thereof, of the taxing district having a share in the claim in bankruptcy as determined in division (D) of this section. The new notes shall be distributed, upon receipt, to each taxing authority in full satisfaction of its claim or in full satisfaction of the portion of its claim represented by the notes so received. If notes cannot be issued in denominations equal to the taxing district's proportionate share, the treasurer shall certify to the taxing authority of the district the amount of notes held by the treasurer on behalf of the district and for which notes cannot be issued pursuant to the taxing authority's decision under this subdivision. Upon receipt of such certification, the taxing authority may borrow money and issue notes against such certification in the same manner as is provided by division (F) of this section. If a taxing authority elects the option provided under division (E)(1) of this section, it may at any subsequent time elect instead the option provided under division (E)(2) of this section by resolution approved by a majority of its members. The election of the option provided under division (E)(2) of this section becomes final upon receipt by the taxing authority of the new notes or certification distributed by the county treasurer under such division. Each taxing authority shall certify a copy of any resolution adopted under this division to the county treasurer who shall take appropriate action as directed by each taxing authority. (F) A taxing authority having possession of any railroad note or a treasurer's certification issued under division (E)(2) of this section may, by approval of a majority of its members, borrow money and issue its note in anticipation of the revenue payable on maturity of the railroad note and pledge the railroad note or the proceeds thereof. Such anticipation note shall mature no later than the railroad note and shall be in an amount no greater than seventy per cent of the face amount of said railroad note. By like action a taxing authority may sell any railroad note in its possession at public or private offering for not less than the prevailing market price. Such a sale or borrowing shall be exempt from all other requirements and limitations of the Revised Code, including the requirements of the Uniform Bond Law. (1) If a taxing authority desires to issue delinquent tax bonds pursuant to section 131.23 of the Revised Code prior to either receipt of any payment from a railroad in bankruptcy or utilization of the authority granted in this section, the taxing authority may determine whether or not the net amount of delinquent taxes unpledged for purposes of division (B)(5) of section 131.23 of the Revised Code shall include all or part of the delinquent taxes owed by a railroad, or, if notes have been received pursuant to this section, the unpaid principal amount of such notes. If the taxing authority determines that any such railroad delinquencies or note amount shall be included under section 131.23 of the Revised Code, the amount which may be borrowed pursuant to this section may not exceed seventy per cent of the total face amount of railroad notes remaining after deducting the amount so included. (2) If a taxing authority desires to issue delinquent tax bonds pursuant to section 131.23 of the Revised Code after utilization of the authority granted in this section, the net amount of delinquent taxes unpledged for purposes of division (B)(5) of section 131.23 of the Revised Code may not include the principal amount of railroad notes which have been borrowed against or sold pursuant to this section. (G) When a taxing authority receives a railroad note, the face amount of such note shall not be considered as revenue for any purpose in the year in which the note is received. Upon sale or maturity of the note, any proceeds not pledged pursuant to division (F) of this section shall be considered as unanticipated revenue from a new source and all of the provisions of law pertaining to such revenue, including section 5705.36 of the Revised Code, shall apply. (H) When there are present in a county nonrepresented taxing districts as provided in amended substitute house bill 336 of the 112th general assembly, all of the provisions of this section shall apply to such districts, except as follows: (1) Payments by cash or check may be made payable, and delivered, directly to the treasurer of the taxing district. Any notes included in the settlement of the district's claim may be issued, and delivered, directly to said treasurer. Upon receipt of any of such payments, the treasurer of the taxing district shall certify, to the county treasurer of the county in which the district is located, the fact of such receipt and the amounts so received. (2) If the claim of a nonrepresented taxing district is not paid directly to the treasurer of the district but is included with payments for the remainder of the county, cash payments included in the initial settlement shall be distributed as provided in divisions (B) and (D) of this section. Any notes received as payment shall be exchanged and distributed to nonrepresented taxing districts upon receipt. Sec. 5705.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Subdivision" means any county; municipal corporation; township; township police district; joint police district; township fire district; joint fire district; joint ambulance district; joint emergency medical services district; fire and ambulance district; joint recreation district; township waste disposal district; township road district; community college district; technical college district; detention facility district; a district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code; a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code; a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district; a drainage improvement district created under section 6131.52 of the Revised Code; a lake facilities authority created under Chapter 353. of the Revised Code; a union cemetery district; a county school financing district; a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, joint vocational school district; a regional student education district created under section 3313.83 of the Revised Code; or a career-technical cooperative education district created under section 3313.831 of the Revised Code. (B) "Municipal corporation" means all municipal corporations, including those that have adopted a charter under Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution. (C) "Taxing authority" or "bond issuing authority" means any of the following: (1) In the case of any county, the board of county commissioners; in the case of a municipal corporation, the council or other legislative authority of the municipal corporation; in the case of a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district, the board of education; in the case of a community college district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a technical college district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a detention facility district, a district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, or a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, the joint board of county commissioners of the district; in the case of a township, the board of township trustees; in the case of a joint police district, the joint police district board; in the case of a joint fire district, the board of fire district trustees; in the case of a joint recreation district, the joint recreation district board of trustees; in the case of a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, the district's board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; in the case of a joint ambulance district or a fire and ambulance district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a union cemetery district, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation and the board of township trustees, acting jointly as described in section 759.341 of the Revised Code; in the case of a drainage improvement district, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the drainage district is located; in the case of a lake facilities authority, the board of directors; in the case of a joint emergency medical services district, the joint board of county commissioners of all counties in which all or any part of the district lies; and in the case of a township police district, a township fire district, a township road district, or a township waste disposal district, the board of township trustees of the township in which the district is located. (2) The educational service center governing board that serves as the taxing authority of a county school financing district as provided in section 3311.50 of the Revised Code, the board of directors of a regional student education district created under section 3313.83 of the Revised Code, and the board of directors of a career-technical cooperative education district created under section 3313.831 of the Revised Code. (3) The governing body responsible for levying a tax for any taxing unit for which a taxing authority is not defined pursuant to division (C)(1) or (2) of this section. (D) "Fiscal officer" in the case of a county, means the county auditor; in the case of a municipal corporation, the city auditor or village clerk, or an officer who, by virtue of the charter, has the duties and functions of the city auditor or village clerk, except that in the case of a municipal university the board of directors of which have assumed, in the manner provided by law, the custody and control of the funds of the university, the chief accounting officer of the university shall perform, with respect to the funds, the duties vested in the fiscal officer of the subdivision by sections 5705.41 and 5705.44 of the Revised Code; in the case of a school district, the treasurer of the board of education; in the case of a county school financing district, the treasurer of the educational service center governing board that serves as the taxing authority; in the case of a township, the township fiscal officer; in the case of a joint police district, the treasurer of the district; in the case of a joint fire district, the clerk of the board of fire district trustees; in the case of a joint ambulance district, the clerk of the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a joint emergency medical services district, the person appointed as fiscal officer pursuant to division (D) of section 307.053 of the Revised Code; in the case of a fire and ambulance district, the person appointed as fiscal officer pursuant to division (B) of section 505.375 of the Revised Code; in the case of a joint recreation district, the person designated pursuant to section 755.15 of the Revised Code; in the case of a union cemetery district, the clerk of the municipal corporation designated in section 759.34 of the Revised Code; in the case of a children's home district, educational service center, general health district, joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, county library district, detention facility district, district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, or a metropolitan park district for which no treasurer has been appointed pursuant to section 1545.07 of the Revised Code, the county auditor of the county designated by law to act as the auditor of the district; in the case of a metropolitan park district which has appointed a treasurer pursuant to section 1545.07 of the Revised Code, that treasurer; in the case of a drainage improvement district, the auditor of the county in which the drainage improvement district is located; in the case of a lake facilities authority, the fiscal officer designated under section 353.02 of the Revised Code; in the case of a regional student education district, the fiscal officer appointed pursuant to section 3313.83 of the Revised Code; in the case of a career-technical cooperative education district, the fiscal officer appointed pursuant to section 3313.831 of the Revised Code; and in all other cases, the officer responsible for keeping the appropriation accounts and drawing warrants for the expenditure of the moneys of the district or taxing unit. (E) "Permanent improvement" or "improvement" means any property, asset, or improvement with an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more, including land and interests therein, and reconstructions, enlargements, and extensions thereof having an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more. (F) "Current operating expenses" and "current expenses" mean the lawful expenditures of a subdivision, except those for permanent improvements, and except payments for interest, sinking fund, and retirement of bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of the subdivision. (G) "Debt charges" means interest, sinking fund, and retirement charges on bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness. (H) "Taxing unit" means any subdivision or other governmental district having authority to levy taxes on the property in the district or issue bonds that constitute a charge against the property of the district, including conservancy districts, metropolitan park districts, sanitary districts, road districts, and other districts. (I) "District authority" means any board of directors, trustees, commissioners, or other officers controlling a district institution or activity that derives its income or funds from two or more subdivisions, such as the educational service center, the trustees of district children's homes, the district board of health, a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district's board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, detention facility districts, a joint recreation district board of trustees, districts organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, combined districts organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and other such boards. (J) "Tax list" and "tax duplicate" mean the general tax lists and duplicates prescribed by sections 319.28 and 319.29 of the Revised Code. (K) "Property" as applied to a tax levy means taxable property listed on general tax lists and duplicates. (L) "Association library district" means a territory, the boundaries of which are defined by the state library board pursuant to division (I) of section 3375.01 of the Revised Code, in which a library association or private corporation maintains a free public library. (M) "Library district" means a territory, the boundaries of which are defined by the state library board pursuant to section 3375.01 of the Revised Code, in which the board of trustees of a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library maintains a free public library. (N) "Qualifying library levy" means either of the following: (1) A levy for the support of a library association or private corporation that has an association library district with boundaries that are not identical to those of a subdivision; (2) A levy proposed under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the support of the board of trustees of a public library that has a library district with boundaries that are not identical to those of a subdivision. (O) "School library district" means a school district in which a free public library has been established that is under the control and management of a board of library trustees as provided in section 3375.15 of the Revised Code. (P) "The county auditor's market value" means the true value in money of real property. (Q)(1) "Effective rate" means one of the following: (a) For a levy that is the renewal of an existing levy or an existing levy extended to additional territory, the effective tax rate of the levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code; (b) For a levy that is the increase of an existing levy, the effective tax rate of the portion of the levy equal to the rate of the existing levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code, plus the rate of the additional portion of the levy; (c) For a levy that is the decrease of an existing levy, the effective tax rate of the levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code, and as proportionately reduced to account for the decrease pursuant to rules adopted by the tax commissioner. (2) As used in division (Q)(1) of this section: (a) "Effective tax rate" has the same meaning in section 323.08 of the Revised Code. (b) "Class one property" means real property classified as residential or agricultural under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (R) "Qualifying subdivision" means a taxing unit, created by one or more member authorities, with a taxing authority or any other governing authority the majority of the members of which are not required to be elected local officials. (S) "Elected local official" means a member of a board of township trustees, a board of county commissioners, a legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or an educational service center governing board, or any other township, county, or municipal official serving in an elected office. (T) "Member authority" means the board of commissioners of a county, the board of trustees of a township, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or the educational service center governing board that either created or joined a qualifying subdivision and remains a member thereof or has territory therein. (U) "Disaster declaration" means a declaration issued by the president of the United States or the governor that an emergency exists. (V) "Disaster period" means the period that begins on a date on which a disaster declaration is issued through the date that is two years following the day that the disaster declaration expires or is rescinded. Sec. 5705.03. (A) The taxing authority of each subdivision may levy taxes annually, subject to the limitations of sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code, on the real and personal property within the subdivision for the purpose of paying the current operating expenses of the subdivision and acquiring or constructing permanent improvements. The taxing authority of each subdivision and taxing unit shall, subject to the limitations of such sections, levy such taxes annually as are necessary to pay the interest and sinking fund on and retire at maturity the bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of such subdivision and taxing unit, including levies in anticipation of which the subdivision or taxing unit has incurred indebtedness. (B)(1) When a taxing authority determines that it is necessary to levy a tax outside the ten-mill limitation for any purpose authorized by the Revised Code, the taxing authority shall certify to the county auditor a resolution or ordinance requesting that the county auditor certify to the taxing authority the amounts described in division (B)(2)(B)(2)(a) of this section. The resolution or ordinance shall state all of the following: (a) The proposed rate of the tax, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, or the dollar amount of revenue to be generated by the proposed tax; (b) The purpose of the tax; (c) Whether the tax is an additional levy, a renewal of an existing tax, a renewal of an existing tax with an increase or a decrease, a reduction or decrease of an existing tax, or an extension of an existing tax to additional territory; (d) The section of the Revised Code authorizing submission of the question of the tax; (e) The term of years of the tax or if the tax is for a continuing period of time; (f) That the tax is to be levied upon the entire territory of the subdivision or, if authorized by the Revised Code, a description of the portion of the territory of the subdivision in which the tax is to be levied; (g) The date of the election at which the question of the tax shall appear on the ballot; (h) That the ballot measure shall be submitted to the entire territory of the subdivision or, if authorized by the Revised Code, a description of the portion of the territory of the subdivision to which the ballot measure shall be submitted; (i) The tax year in which the tax will first be levied and the calendar year in which the tax will first be collected; (j) Each such county in which the subdivision has territory. The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district may also designate, in a resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section, an amount of the district's carry-over balance from the proceeding fiscal year, based on the most recent certification made by the district under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code, as reserved for expenditure on current or future permanent improvements within the following three years. (2)(2)(a) Upon receipt of a resolution or ordinance certified under division (B)(1) of this section, the county auditor shall certify to the taxing authority each of the following, as applicable to that levy: (a)(i) The total current tax valuation of the subdivision. (b)(ii) The number of mills for each one dollar of taxable value that is required to generate a specified amount of revenue. (c)(iii) Either of the following: (i)(I) If the levy is to renew, renew and increase, renew and decrease, reduce or decrease, or extend to additional territory an existing levy that is subject to reduction under section 319.301 of the Revised Code, the levy's effective rate, expressed in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value; (ii)(II) For all other levies, the levy's rate, described in division (B)(2)(b)(B)(2)(a)(ii) or (d)(iv) of this section, expressed in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value. (d)(iv) The dollar amount of revenue, rounded to the nearest dollar, that would be generated by a specified number of mills for each one dollar of taxable value. (e)(v) For any levy or portion of a levy except a levy or portion of a levy to pay debt charges, an estimate of the levy's annual collections, rounded to the nearest dollar, which shall be calculated assuming that the amount of the tax list of the taxing authority remains throughout the life of the levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. (f)(vi) If the purpose of the tax is for current expenses or current operating expenses and the resolution is certified by a city, local, or exempted village school district, the amount by which the carry-over balance in the district's general operating budget from the preceding fiscal year exceeds the district's general fund expenditures made in the preceding fiscal year, expressed both in dollars and as a percentage of those expenditures. This amount and percentage shall be determined on the basis of the most recent certification made by the district to the county budget commission under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. The auditor shall exclude any amount designated under division (B)(1) of this section for current or future permanent improvements in determining the district's carry-over balance for the purpose of this computation. If a subdivision is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the subdivision is located the current tax valuation for the portion of the subdivision in that county. The county auditor shall issue the certification to the taxing authority within ten days after receiving the taxing authority's resolution or ordinance requesting it. (b) If a school district proposes to levy a tax under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code on the basis that some or all of the territory of district is covered by a disaster declaration during the disaster period, the district shall certify to the director of education and workforce the resolution the district adopted under division (B)(1) of this section and a copy of the applicable disaster declaration with a request that the director approve the proposed tax. The director shall certify to the district its approval or disapproval within fifteen days after receiving the resolution. The director shall only approve the tax if the director finds that a disaster period exists for all or part of the district's territory on the date the district adopted the resolution under division (B)(1) of this section and the district has been impacted by the emergency described in the disaster declaration. (3) Upon receiving the certification from the county auditor under division (B)(2)(B)(2)(a) of this section and, if required, the certification from the director of education and workforce under division (B)(2)(b) of this section, unless the percentage certified under division (B)(2)(f)(B)(2)(a)(vi) of this section is one hundred per cent or more, except in the case of a renewal levy, the taxing authority may adopt a resolution or ordinance stating the rate of the tax levy, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and the rate or effective rate, as applicable, in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value, as estimated by the county auditor, and that the taxing authority will proceed with the submission of the question of the tax to electors. The taxing authority shall certify this resolution or ordinance, a copy of the county auditor's and director of education and workforce's certifications, a copy of any applicable disaster declaration, and the resolution or ordinance the taxing authority adopted under division (B)(1) of this section to the proper county board of elections in the manner and within the time prescribed by the section of the Revised Code governing submission of the question. The county board of elections shall not submit the question of the tax to electors unless a copy of the county auditor's certification those certifications and, if applicable, disaster declaration accompanies the resolutions or ordinances the taxing authority certifies to the board. Before requesting a taxing authority to submit a tax levy, any agency or authority authorized to make that request shall first request the certification from the county auditor provided under this section. (4) This division is supplemental to, and not in derogation of, any similar requirement governing the certification by the county auditor of the tax valuation of a subdivision or necessary tax rates for the purposes of the submission of the question of a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation, including section 133.18 of the Revised Code. (C) All taxes levied on property shall be extended on the tax list and duplicate by the county auditor of the county in which the property is located, and shall be collected by the county treasurer of such county in the same manner and under the same laws and rules as are prescribed for the assessment and collection of county taxes. The proceeds of any tax levied by or for any subdivision when received by its fiscal officer shall be deposited in its treasury to the credit of the appropriate fund. Sec. 5705.194. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Fiscal caution" means a state of fiscal caution declared by the director of education and workforce under section 3316.031 of the Revised Code. (2) "Fiscal watch" means a state of fiscal watch declared by the auditor of state under section 3316.03 of the Revised Code. (3) "Fiscal emergency" means a state of fiscal emergency declared by the auditor of state under section 3316.03 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualifying levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (5) A tax shall be considered to be an "existing tax" through the year following the last year it can be placed on the tax list. (B) The board of education of any city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district at any time before the effective date of this amendment that is in fiscal caution, fiscal watch, or fiscal emergency or is impacted by an emergency that is the subject of a disaster declaration may declare by resolution that the revenue that will be raised by all tax levies which the district is authorized to impose, when combined with state and federal revenues, will be insufficient to provide for the emergency requirements of the school district or to avoid an operating deficit, and that it is therefore necessary to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the current expenses of the district. The resolution shall be confined to a single purpose and shall specify that purpose. If the levy is proposed A tax levied under division (B) of this section may not be renewed. (C) The board of education of any city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district that levies a tax under this section that was approved by electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, may adopt a resolution to renew up to all or a portion of the proceeds derived from one or more existing levies imposed pursuant to this section, it shall be called a renewal levy and shall be so designated on the ballotthat existing tax. If two or more existing levies are to be included in a single renewal levy but are not scheduled to expire in the same year, the resolution shall specify that the existing levies to be renewed shall not be levied after the year preceding the year in which the renewal levy is first imposed. Notwithstanding the original purpose of any one or more existing levies that are to be in any single renewal levythe existing tax, the purpose of the renewal levy may shall be either to avoid an operating deficit or to provide for the emergency requirements of the school districtfor the current expenses of the district. A tax levied under division (C) of this section may be renewed for the same or a lesser sum and in the same manner as the existing tax. Any tax levied under division (C) of this section, including any subsequent renewal of such a tax, is a qualifying levy if the tax that was approved by electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, was a subsequent renewal levy described in that term's definition. (D) The board of education of a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district that levies a tax under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code that was approved by electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, may adopt a resolution to renew up to all or a portion of the proceeds derived from the existing tax in the final tax year it is levied. The renewal levy shall levy that sum, or portion thereof, for each year of the levy, and the sum levied shall not be increased as otherwise described in section 5705.199 of the Revised Code. The purpose of the renewal levy shall be for the current expenses of the district. A tax levied under division (D) of this section may be renewed for the same or a lesser sum and in the same manner as the existing tax. Any tax levied under division (D) of this section, including any subsequent renewal of such a tax, is a qualifying levy if the tax that was approved by electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, was a subsequent substitute levy as described in that term's definition. The (E) A resolution adopted under division (B), (C), or (D) of this section shall further specify the amount of money it is necessary to raise for the specified purpose current expenses of the district for each calendar year the millage is to be imposed; if a renewal levyresolution adopted under division (C) or (D) of this section, whether the levy is to renew all, or a portion of, the proceeds derived from one or more the existing leviestax; and the number of years in which the millage is to be in effect, which may include a levy upon the current year's tax list. The number of years may be any number not exceeding tenfive. The question shall be submitted at a special election on a date specified in the resolution. The date shall not be earlier than eighty days after the adoption and certification of the resolution to the county auditor and shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. A resolution for a renewal levy adopted under division (C) of this section, or adopted under division (D) of this section to renew a tax levied under that division, shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted on a date on which a special election may be held under division (D) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, except for the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August, during the last year the levy to be renewed existing tax may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held in the ensuing year, except that if the resolution proposes renewing two or more existing levies, the question shall be submitted on the date of the general or primary election held during the last year at least one of the levies to be renewed may be extended on that list and duplicate, or at any election held during the ensuing year. For purposes of this section and section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, a levy shall be considered to be an "existing levy" through the year following the last year it can be placed on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate. A resolution adopted under division (D) of this section, excluding a resolution to renew a tax levied under that division, shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted on a date on which a general election may be held during the last year the existing tax may be extended on the tax list, or at any election held in the ensuing year. The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. A copy of the resolution shall immediately after its passing be certified to the county auditor of the proper county. Section 5705.195 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of questions to the electors under this section and other matters concerning the election. Publication of notice of the election shall be made in one newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. If a majority of the electors voting on the question submitted in an election vote in favor of the levy, the board of education of the school district may make the additional levy necessary to raise the amount specified in the resolution for the purpose stated in the resolution. The tax levy shall be included in the next tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. After the approval of the levy and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not exceeding the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have principal payment in the year of their issuance. Sec. 5705.195. Within ten days after a resolution adopted under division (B), (C), or (D) of section 5705.194 of the Revised Code is certified to the county auditor as provided by that section, the auditor shall calculate and certify to the taxing authority the annual levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, throughout the life of the levy which will be required to produce the annual amount set forth in the resolution assuming that the amount of the tax list of such subdivision remains throughout the life of the levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. For a resolution adopted under division (D) of section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall also certify an estimate of the taxes charged and payable from the existing tax for the final tax year of its term. Upon receiving the certification from the county auditor, if the taxing authority desires to proceed with the submission of the question it shall, not less than ninety days before the day of such election, certify its resolution, together with the amount of the average tax levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, as certified by the county auditor, the number of years the levy is to run, and, if applicable, the taxes charged and payable from the existing tax for the final tax year of its term to the board of elections of the county which shall prepare the ballots and make other necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the voters of the subdivision. Sec. 5705.196. The election provided for in section 5705.194 of the Revised Code shall be held at the regular places for voting in the district and shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the district for the election of county officers, provided that in any such election in which only part of the electors of a precinct are qualified to vote, the board of elections may assign voters in such part to an adjoining precinct. Such an assignment may be made to an adjoining precinct in another county with the consent and approval of the board of elections of such other county. Notice of the election shall be published in one newspaper of general circulation in the district once a week for two consecutive weeks or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. Such notice shall state the annual proceeds of the proposed levy, the purpose for which such proceeds are to be used, the number of years during which the levy shall run, and the estimated average additional tax rate expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, outside the limitation imposed by Ohio Constitution, Article XII, Section 2, as certified by the county auditor. Sec. 5705.197. (A) The form of the ballot to be used at the election provided for in section 5705.195 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall a fixed-sum levy be imposed by the _____________ (here insert name of school district) for the purpose of paying the current operating expenses of the district in the sum of $__________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce) and a levy of taxes to be made outside of the ten-mill limitation estimated by the county auditor to average __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's market value, for a period of __________ (here insert the number of years the millage is to be imposed) years? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " If the tax is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after "years," the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." If the levy submitted is a proposal to renew all or a portion of an existing tax adopted under division (C) or (D) of section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot specified in this section must be changed by adding the following at the beginning of the form, after the first instance of the term "levy": (A) "Renewing an existing levy" in the case of a proposal to renew an existing tax in the same amount; (B) "Renewing part of an existing levy, being a reduction of $______" in the case of a renewal of only part of an existing tax. Sec. 5709.92. (A) As used in this section: (1) "School district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (2) "Joint vocational school district" means a joint vocational school district created under section 3311.16 of the Revised Code, and includes a cooperative education school district created under section 3311.52 or 3311.521 of the Revised Code and a county school financing district created under section 3311.50 of the Revised Code. (3) "Total resources" means the sum of the amounts described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (g) of this section less any reduction required under division (C)(3)(a) of this section. (a) The state education aid for fiscal year 2015; (b) The sum of the payments received in fiscal year 2015 for current expense levy losses under division (C)(3) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, excluding the portion of such payments attributable to levies for joint vocational school district purposes; (c) The sum of fixed-sum levy loss payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 under division (F)(1) of section 5727.85 and division (E)(1) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, for fixed-sum levies charged and payable for a purpose other than paying debt charges; (d) The district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expense purposes for tax year 2014, including taxes charged and payable from emergency levies charged and payable under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, excluding taxes levied for joint vocational school district purposes or levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code; (e) The amount certified for fiscal year 2015 under division (A)(2) of section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (f) Distributions received during calendar year 2014 from taxes levied under section 718.09 of the Revised Code; (g) Distributions received during fiscal year 2015 from the gross casino revenue county student fund. (4)(a) "State education aid" for a school district means the sum of state amounts computed for the district under sections 3317.022 and 3317.0212 of the Revised Code after any amounts are added or subtracted under Section 263.240 of Am. Sub. H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR CITY, LOCAL, AND EXEMPTED VILLAGE SCHOOL DISTRICTS." (b) "State education aid" for a joint vocational district means the amount computed for the district under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code after any amounts are added or subtracted under Section 263.250 of Am. Sub. H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR JOINT VOCATIONAL SCHOOL DISTRICTS." (5) "Taxes charged and payable" means taxes charged and payable after the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code but before the reductions required by sections 319.302 and 323.152 of the Revised Code. (6) "Capacity quintile" means the capacity measure quintiles determined under division (B) of this section. (7) "Threshold per cent" means the following: (a) For a school district in the lowest capacity quintile, one per cent for fiscal year 2016 and two per cent for fiscal year 2017. (b) For a school district in the second lowest capacity quintile, one and one-fourth per cent for fiscal year 2016 and two and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2017. (c) For a school district in the third lowest capacity quintile, one and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2016 and three per cent for fiscal year 2017. (d) For a school district in the second highest capacity quintile, one and three-fourths per cent for fiscal year 2016 and three and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2017. (e) For a school district in the highest capacity quintile, two per cent for fiscal year 2016 and four per cent for fiscal year 2017. (f) For a joint vocational school district, two per cent for fiscal year 2016 and four per cent for fiscal year 2017. (8) "Current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a school district or joint vocational school district in fiscal year 2015 for current expense levy losses under division (C)(3) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time, less any reduction required under division (C)(3)(b) of this section. (9) "Non-current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a school district or joint vocational school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (C)(3)(c) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12)(c) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, and levy losses in fiscal year 2015 under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as that section existed at that time attributable to levies for and payments received for losses on levies intended to generate money for maintenance of classroom facilities. (10) "Operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses" means the sum of payments received by a school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (E) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, excluding levy losses for debt purposes. (11) "Operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses" means the sum of payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code, excluding levy losses for debt purposes. (12) "TPP fixed-sum debt levy losses" means the sum of payments received by a school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (E) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code for debt purposes. (13) "S.B. 3 fixed-sum debt levy losses" means the sum of payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code for debt purposes. (14) "Qualifying levies" means qualifying levies described in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code as that section was in effect before July 1, 2015. (15) "Total taxable value" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall rank all school districts in the order of districts' capacity measures determined under former section 3317.018 of the Revised Code from lowest to highest, and divide such ranking into quintiles, with the first quintile containing the twenty per cent of school districts having the lowest capacity measure and the fifth quintile containing the twenty per cent of school districts having the highest capacity measure. This calculation and ranking shall be performed once, in fiscal year 2016. (C)(1) In fiscal year 2016, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the sum of the amounts described in divisions (C)(1)(a) or (b) and (C)(1)(c) of this section. In fiscal year 2017, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the amount described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (a) If the ratio of the current expense allocation to total resources is equal to or less than the district's threshold percent, zero; (b) If the ratio of the current expense allocation to total resources is greater than the district's threshold per cent, the difference between the current expense allocation and the product of the threshold percentage and total resources; (c) For fiscal year 2016, the product of the non-current expense allocation multiplied by fifty per cent. (2) In fiscal year 2018 and subsequent fiscal years, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the difference obtained by subtracting the amount described in division (C)(2)(b) of this section from the amount described in division (C)(2)(a) of this section, provided that such amount is greater than zero. (a) The sum of the payments received by the district under division (C)(1)(b) or (C)(2) of this section for the immediately preceding fiscal year; (b) One-sixteenth of one per cent of the average of the total taxable value of the district for tax years 2014, 2015, and 2016. (3)(a) "Total resources" used to compute payments under division (C)(1) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable for tax year 2014. (b) "Current expense allocation" used to compute payments under division (C)(1) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that the payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable for tax year 2014. (4) The department of education and workforce shall report to each school district and joint vocational school district the apportionment of the payments under division (C)(1) of this section among the district's funds based on qualifying levies. (D)(1) Payments in the following amounts shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts in tax years 2016 through 2021: (a) In tax year 2016, the sum of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (b) In tax year 2017, the sum of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and eighty per cent of operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (c) In tax year 2018, the sum of eighty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and sixty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (d) In tax year 2019, the sum of sixty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and forty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (e) In tax year 2020, the sum of forty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and twenty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (f) In tax year 2021, twenty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses. No payment shall be made under division (D)(1) of this section after tax year 2021. (2) Amounts are payable under division (D) of this section for fixed-sum levy losses only to the extent of such losses for qualifying levies that remain in effect for the current tax year. For this purpose, a qualifying levy levied under section 5705.194 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code remains in effect for the current tax year only if a tax levied under either of those sections is charged and payable for the current tax year for an annual sum at least equal to the annual sum levied by the board of education for tax year 2004 under those sections less the amount of the payment under this division. (E)(1) For fixed-sum levies for debt purposes, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the district's fixed-sum levy loss determined under division (E) of section 5751.20 and division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, and paid in tax year 2014. No payment shall be made for qualifying levies that are no longer charged and payable. (2) Beginning in 2016, by the thirty-first day of January of each year, the tax commissioner shall review the calculation of fixed-sum levy loss for debt purposes determined under division (E) of section 5751.20 and division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015. If the commissioner determines that a fixed-sum levy that had been scheduled to be reimbursed in the current year is no longer charged and payable, a revised calculation for that year and all subsequent years shall be made. (F)(1) For taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation for debt purposes in tax year 1998 in the case of electric company tax value losses, and in tax year 1999 in the case of natural gas company tax value losses, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the loss computed under division (D) of section 5727.85 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, as if the tax were a fixed-rate levy, but those payments shall extend through fiscal year 2016. (2) For taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation for debt purposes in tax year 2005, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the loss computed under division (D) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, as if the tax were a fixed-rate levy, but those payments shall extend through fiscal year 2018. (G) If all the territory of a school district or joint vocational school district is merged with another district, or if a part of the territory of a school district or joint vocational school district is transferred to an existing or newly created district, the department of education and workforce, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall adjust the payments made under this section as follows: (1) For a merger of two or more districts, fixed-sum levy losses, total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation of the successor district shall be the sum of such items for each of the districts involved in the merger. (2) If property is transferred from one district to a previously existing district, the amount of the total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation that shall be transferred to the recipient district shall be an amount equal to the total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation of the transferor district times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of pupils being transferred to the recipient district, measured, in the case of a school district, by formula ADM as defined in section 3317.02of the Revised Code or, in the case of a joint vocational school district, by formula ADM as defined for a joint vocational school district in that section, and the denominator of which is the formula ADM of the transferor district. (3) After December 31, 2010, if property is transferred from one or more districts to a district that is newly created out of the transferred property, the newly created district shall be deemed not to have any total resources, current expense allocation, total allocation, or non-current expense allocation. (4) If the recipient district under division (G)(2) of this section or the newly created district under division (G)(3) of this section is assuming debt from one or more of the districts from which the property was transferred and any of the districts losing the property had fixed-sum levy losses, the department of education and workforce, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall make an equitable division of the reimbursements for those losses. (H) The payments required by divisions (C), (D), (E), (F), and (I) of this section shall be distributed periodically to each school and joint vocational school district by the department of education and workforce unless otherwise provided for. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, if a levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after 2014, payments to the school district or joint vocational school district shall be reduced to the extent that the payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to the levy loss of that levy. (I) For fiscal years 2022 through 2026, if the total amount to be received under divisions (C) and (E) of this section by any school district that has a nuclear power plant located within its territory is less than the amount the district received under this section in fiscal year 2017, the district shall receive a supplemental payment equal to the difference between the amount to be received under those divisions for the fiscal year and the amount received under this section in fiscal year 2017. Section 2. That existing sections 319.301, 323.32, 5705.01, 5705.03, 5705.194, and 5709.92 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The amendment by this act of section 319.301 of the Revised Code applies to tax year 2026 and every tax year thereafter. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________